Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 2. Administration.

Sec. 43.23.040.
Penalties and enforcement. [Repealed, § 22 ch 102 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 43.23.045.
Dividend fund.

The dividend fund is established as a separate fund in the state treasury. The dividend fund shall be administered by the commissioner and shall be invested by the commissioner in the same manner as provided in AS

37.10.070

.

[Repealed, § 29 ch 134 SLA 1992.]

[Repealed, § 24 ch 99 SLA 1985.]

Unless specified otherwise in an appropriation act, the unexpended and unobligated balance of an appropriation to implement this chapter lapses into the dividend fund on June 30 of the fiscal year for which the appropriation was made and shall be used in determining the amount of and paying the subsequent year’s dividend as provided in AS

43.23.025(a)(1)(B)

.

[Repealed, § 29 ch 134 SLA 1992.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1982; am § 24 ch 99 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 57 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1989; am §§ 2, 3 ch 18 SLA 1991; am § 29 ch 134 SLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For annual deposit into the dividend fund, see AS

37.13.145

.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter related to the amendment to (b) of this section by
ch. 38, SLA 1989 (CSHB 276(Fin) am), see 1989 House Journal 933-934.

Sec. 43.23.048.
Restorative justice account.

The restorative justice account is created as a separate account in the dividend fund. The commissioner shall transfer from the dividend fund to the restorative justice account each fiscal year an amount equal to the amount that would have been paid during the previous fiscal year to individuals who were ineligible to receive dividends under AS

43.23.005(d)

if they had been eligible.

The legislature may appropriate amounts from the account to the following recipients in the priority order and percentages listed:

10 to 13 percent to the crime victim compensation fund established under AS

18.67.162

for payments to crime victims and for operating costs of the Violent Crimes Compensation Board;

two to six percent to the office of victims’ rights for payments to crime victims as provided in AS

24.65.105

and for operating costs of the office of victims’ rights;

one to three percent to nonprofit organizations to provide grants for services for crime victims and domestic violence and sexual assault programs;

one to three percent to nonprofit organizations to provide grants for mental health services and substance abuse treatment for offenders; and

79 to 88 percent to the Department of Corrections for costs related to incarceration or probation.

A person who is subject to an order of restitution all or part of which is paid under this section shall reimburse the state for the amount paid by the state. The state may enforce payment of reimbursement under this subsection as if the reimbursement were a civil judgment enforceable by execution.

The legislature may appropriate money received under (c) of this section to the restorative justice account.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 6 ch 21 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 14,
ch. 21, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 43.23.050.
Dividend fund established. [Repealed, § 22 ch 102 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 43.23.055.
Duties of the department.

The department shall

annually pay permanent fund dividends from the dividend fund;

subject to AS

43.23.011

and (8) of this section, adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) that establish procedures and time limits for claiming a permanent fund dividend; the department shall determine the number of eligible applicants by October 1 of the year for which the dividend is declared and pay the dividends by December 31 of that year;

adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) that establish procedures and time limits for an individual upon emancipation or upon reaching majority to apply for permanent fund dividends not received during minority because the parent, guardian, or other authorized representative did not apply on behalf of the individual;

assist residents of the state, particularly in rural areas, who, because of language, disability, or inaccessibility to public transportation, need assistance to establish eligibility and to apply for permanent fund dividends;

use a list of individuals ineligible for a dividend under AS

43.23.005(d)

provided annually by the Department of Corrections and the Department of Public Safety to determine the number and identity of those individuals;

adopt regulations that are necessary to implement AS

43.23.005(d)

and

43.23.048

;

adopt regulations that establish procedures for the parent, guardian, or other authorized representative of a disabled individual to apply for prior year permanent fund dividends not received by the disabled individual because no application was submitted on behalf of the individual;

adopt regulations that establish procedures for an individual to apply to have a dividend disbursement under AS

37.25.050(a)(2)

reissued if it is not collected within two years after the date of its issuance; however, the department may not establish a time limit within which an application to have a disbursement reissued must be filed;

provide any information, upon request, contained in permanent fund dividend records to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law; if the information is contained in an electronic data base, the department shall provide the requesting agency with either

access to the data base; or

a copy of the information in the data base and a statement certifying its contents;

establish a fraud investigation unit for the purpose of assisting the

Department of Law in the prosecution of individuals who apply for or obtain a permanent fund dividend in violation of a provision in AS 11, by detecting and investigating those crimes; and

commissioner to detect and investigate the claiming or paying of permanent fund dividends that should not have been claimed by or paid to an individual and to impose the penalties and enforcement provisions under AS

43.23.270

;

adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) so that contributions under AS

43.23.130

are given a priority over donations under AS

43.23.230

if the total amount of contributions and donations elected by an applicant exceeds the amount of the permanent fund dividend that the applicant is entitled to receive.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 55 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 43 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 54 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 68 SLA 1990; am § 14 ch 4 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1993; am § 5 ch 46 SLA 1996; am § 144 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 23 ch 175 SLA 2004; am § 25 ch 42 SLA 2006; am § 7 ch 21 SLA 2018; am § 7 ch 80 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

In 2018, “AS

43.23.270

” was substituted for “43.23.035” in subparagraph (10)(B) to reflect the renumbering of that section.

In 2018, in paragraph (11), " AS

43.23.130

" was substituted for " AS

43.23.062

" and " AS

43.23.230

" was substituted for " AS 43.23.064" to reflect the 2018 renumbering of those sections.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (6), added “and 43.23.048” at the end, and made stylistic changes.

The second 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (11), and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 43.23.060.
Duties of the department. [Repealed, § 22 ch 102 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 43.23.062.
Contributions from dividends. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.130.]

Sec. 43.23.065.
Exemption of and levy on permanent fund dividends. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.140.]

Sec. 43.23.066.
Claims on reimbursement for court-ordered treatment. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.150.]

Sec. 43.23.067.
Claims of defaulted education loans. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.160.]

Sec. 43.23.068.
Claims on defaulted public assistance overpayment. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.170.]

Sec. 43.23.069.
Assignments. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.200.]

Sec. 43.23.070.
Exemption of permanent fund dividends. [Repealed, § 22 ch 102 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 43.23.071.
Fees for processing claims and assignments. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.210.]

Sec. 43.23.072.
Claims for amounts owed under the Alaska Employment Security Act. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.180.]

Sec. 43.23.073.
Claims of the University of Alaska. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.190.]

Sec. 43.23.075.
Eligibility for public assistance. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.240.]

Sec. 43.23.080.
Eligibility for state public assistance payments. [Repealed, § 22 ch 102 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 43.23.085.
Eligibility for state programs. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.250.]

Sec. 43.23.090.
Tax exemption. [Repealed, § 22 ch 102 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 43.23.095.
Definitions. [Renumbered as AS 43.23.295.]

Sec. 43.23.100.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 22 ch 102 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 43.23.101.
Voter registration.

The commissioner shall establish by rule a schedule by which the commissioner will provide, and shall provide as soon as is practicable the director of elections with

electronic records from the permanent fund dividend applications of the information required by AS

15.07.060(a)(1)

— (4) and (7) — (9), and the attestation that such information is true, for each permanent fund dividend applicant who

is a citizen of the United States; and

is at least 18 years of age or will be within 90 days of the date of the application; and

the mailing addresses for all permanent fund dividend applicants.

History.

(§ 1 ch 48 SLA 1992; am § 91 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 7, 2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.23.016

; renumbered in 2018.

Cross references. —

For findings and intent for the 2016 [effective in 2017] changes to this section, see sec. 1 of 2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective March 1, 2017, rewrote the section.

Sec. 43.23.110.
Applicant information confidential.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, information on each permanent fund dividend application, except the applicant’s name, is confidential. The department may only release information that is confidential under this section

to a local, state, or federal government agency;

in compliance with a court order;

to the individual who or agency that files an application on behalf of another;

to a banking institution to verify the direct deposit of a permanent fund dividend or correct an error in that deposit;

as directed to do so by the applicant;

to a contractor who has a contract with a person entitled to obtain the information under (1) — (5) of this section to receive, store, or manage the information on that person’s behalf; a contractor receiving data under this paragraph may only use the data as directed by and for the purposes of the person entitled to obtain the information;

to the division of elections as required by AS

43.23.101

.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the department may release the names and addresses of permanent fund dividend applicants to a legislator of this state and to the legislator’s office staff for official legislative purposes.

Information submitted on a permanent fund dividend application that is used for the purpose of registering an applicant to vote under AS

43.23.101

shall be kept confidential by the division of elections as provided in AS

15.07.195

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 181 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 92 SLA 2008; am §§ 8, 9, 2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.23.017

; renumbered in 2018, at which time “AS

43.23.101

” was substituted for “AS

43.23.016

” to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Cross references. —

For findings and intent for the 2016 [effective in 2017] changes to subsection (a) and the addition of subsection (c), see sec. 1 of 2016 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1.

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective March 1, 2017, added ‘‘Except as provided in (c) of this section,’’ at the beginning of (a), added (a)(7) and (c), and made related changes.